Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1925
Child victim or child witness; testimony; legislative intent.

The Legislature recognizes that obtaining testimony in a criminal prosecution from a child victim of or a child witness to a felony offense may be a delicate matter and may require some special considerations. It is the intent of the Legislature to promote, facilitate, and preserve the testimony of such child victim or child witness in a criminal prosecution to the fullest extent possible consistent with the constitutional right to confrontation guaranteed by the Sixth Amendment of the Constitution of the United States and Article I, section 11, of the Nebraska Constitution.

Laws 1988, LB 90, § 1.